test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v43_odd_laueta_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
  Verb - laueta - ei tsekattu : # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     laueta+V+Inf: laueta
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laukkeen
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: laukkeet
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: laukkee
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: laukkeema
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: laukkeetta
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lauethaan
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: laukesin
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: laukesit
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [laukes, laukesi]
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: laukesimma
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: laukesitta
     laueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lauethiin
     laueta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: lauenu
     laueta+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: lauettu
     laueta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: lauenheet
     laueta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: laukkeeva
     laueta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: laukkeevat
     laueta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lauettava
     laueta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: lauettavat
     
     laueta+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: laukkeisin
     laueta+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: laukkeisit
     laueta+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: laukkeis
     laueta+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: laukkeisimma
     laueta+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: laukkeisitta
     laueta+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: lauettais
     laueta+V+Pass+Cond: lauettais
    
     laueta+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: laukkee
     laueta+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: lauekkaa
     
     laueta+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: laukkeemassa
     laueta+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: laukkeemasta
     laueta+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: laukkeemhaan
     laueta+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: laukkeemalla
     laueta+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: laukkeematta
